District of Columbia statutes.
8-1801

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

(A)

The term “animal at large” means any animal found off the premises of its owner and neither leashed nor otherwise under the immediate control of a person capable of physically restraining it.

(B)

The term “at large” does not include a dog in a dog park that is under the verbal command of a responsible adult.

(2)

The term “animal shelter” means a District of Columbia government facility used by the Animal Care and Control Agency for the care and detention of animals.

(3)

The term “dangerous animal” means an animal that because of specific training or demonstrated behavior threatens the health or safety of the public. The term “dangerous animal” does not include a dangerous dog as defined in § 8-1901(1).

(3A)

The term “District-owned parkland” means outdoor property within the possession and control of the government of the District of Columbia.

(3B)

The term “dog park” means an officially established off-leash dog exercise area on District-owned or federal parkland.

(4)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designee.

(5)

The term “owner” means a person in the District of Columbia who purchases or keeps an animal in temporary or permanent custody except as provided in § 8-1804.

(6)

The term “vaccinated” means protected by a documented inoculation that the Mayor, consistent with the practices of veterinary medicine, determines is currently effective.

Oct. 18, 1979, D.C. Law 3-30, § 2, 26 DCR 765
Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176, § 9(a), 35 DCR 4787
Dec. 10, 2005, D.C. Law 16-40, § 2(a), 52 DCR 9087
Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 104(a), 55 DCR 9186
1981 Ed., § 6-1001.
1973 Ed., § 6-2401.
D.C. Law 16-40, designated existing text of par. (1) as subpar. (1)(A); added subpar. (1)(B); and added pars. (3A) and (3B).
D.C. Law 17-281, in par. (2), substituted “Animal Care and Control Agency” for “Animal Control Agency”.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-30, the “Animal Control Act of 1979”, see Mayor’s Order 2000-97, June 14, 2000 ( 47 DCR 5275).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to D.C. Law 3-30, the Animal Control Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 2009-38, March 23, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6774).
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 2(f) of D.C. Law 9-236 provided that the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.